North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 5. Corporations for Protection and Development of Forests. [Repealed]

§§ 113-61 through 113-77.

Recodified as Article 81 of Chapter 106,

G.S. 106-980

through

G.S. 106-996

, by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(cc), effective July 1, 2011.

§§ 113-77.1 through 113-77.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.